Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 2 ADMINISTRATION
32-11-218. Miscellaneous powers.

The district also has the following powers:

To hire and retain officers, agents, employees, engineers, attorneys, and any other persons, permanent or temporary, necessary or desirable to effect the purposes of this article, to defray any expenses incurred thereby in connection with the district, and to acquire office space, equipment, services, supplies, fire and extended coverage insurance, use and occupancy insurance, workers' compensation insurance, property damage insurance, public liability insurance for the district and its officers, agents, and employees, and other types of insurance, as the board may determine; but, no provision in this article authorizing the acquisition of insurance shall be construed as waiving any immunity of the district or any director, officer, or agent thereof otherwise existing under the laws of the state;

To pay or otherwise to defray the cost of a project;

To pay or otherwise to defray and to contract so to pay or defray, for any term not exceeding fifty years, without an election, except as otherwise provided in this article, the principal of, any interest on, and any other charges pertaining to any securities or other obligations of the federal government, any public body, or other person incurred in connection with any property thereof subsequently acquired by the district and relating to its facilities;

To establish, operate, and maintain facilities within the district across or along any public street, highway, bridge, viaduct, or other public right-of-way, or in, upon, under, or over any vacant public lands, which public lands are or may become the property of a public body, without first obtaining a franchise from the public body having jurisdiction over the same; but the district shall cooperate with any public body having such jurisdiction, shall promptly restore any such street, highway, bridge, viaduct, or other public right-of-way to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be, and shall not use the same in such manner as permanently to impair completely or unnecessarily the usefulness thereof;

To adopt, amend, repeal, enforce, and otherwise administer such reasonable resolutions, rules, regulations, and orders as the district deems necessary or convenient for the operation, maintenance, management, government, and use of the district's facilities and any other drainage and flood control facilities under its control, whether situated within or without or both within and without the territorial limits of the district;

To adopt, amend, repeal, enforce, and otherwise administer under the police power such reasonable flood-plain zoning resolutions, rules, regulations, and orders pertaining to properties within the district of any public body or other person (other than the federal government) reasonably affecting the collection, channeling, impounding, or disposition of rainfall, other surface and subsurface drainage, and storm and flood waters (or any combination thereof), including without limitation variances in the event of any practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship and exceptions in the event of appropriate factors, as the board may from time to time deem necessary or convenient. In the event of any conflict between any flood-plain zoning regulation adopted under this section and any flood-plain zoning regulation adopted by any other public body, the more restrictive regulation shall control.

No such resolution, rule, regulation, or order shall be adopted or amended except by action of the board on the behalf and in the name of the district after a public hearing thereon is held by the board, in connection with which any public body owning drainage and flood control facilities in the area involved or otherwise exercising powers affecting drainage and flood control therein and other persons of interest have an opportunity to be heard, after mailed notice of the hearing is given by the secretary to each such public body and after notice of such hearing is given by publication by the secretary to persons of interest, both known and unknown.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 753, § 23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-23.

L. 90:

(1)(a) amended, p. 573, § 67, effective July 1.

32-11-219. Cooperative powers.

Subject to the provisions of sections 32-11-533 and 32-11-534, the district also has the following powers:

To accept contributions or loans from the federal government for the purpose of financing the planning, acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, and operation of any enterprise in which the district is authorized to engage, and to enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the federal government in the planning, acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the planning, acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, and operation of any such enterprise in accordance with any legislation which congress may adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the federal government in the planning, acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, and operation, or in financing the planning, acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, and operation of any such enterprise, including without limitation costs of engineering, architectural, and economic investigations and studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, and other action preliminary to the acquisition, improvement, or equipment of any project, and to do all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal legislation;

To enter without any election into joint operating or service contracts and agreements; acquisition, improvement, equipment, or disposal contracts; or other arrangements for any term not exceeding fifty years with the federal government and any public body (or any combination thereof), concerning the facilities and any project or property pertaining thereto, whether acquired by the district, by the federal government, or by any public body; and to accept grants and contributions from the federal government, any public body, or any other person in connection therewith;

To enter into and perform without any election, when determined by the board to be in the public interest, contracts and agreements, for any term not exceeding fifty years, with the federal government, any public body, or any other person for the provision and operation by the district of any drainage and flood control facilities pertaining to such facilities of the district or any project relating thereto and the payment periodically thereby to the district of amounts at least sufficient, if any, in the determination of the board, to compensate the district for the cost of providing, operating, and maintaining such facilities serving the federal government, such public body, or such other person, or otherwise;

To enter into and perform without any election contracts and agreements with the federal government, any public body, or any other person for or concerning the planning, construction, lease or other acquisition, improvement, equipment, operation, maintenance, disposal, and the financing of any property pertaining to the facilities of the district or to any project of the district, including but not necessarily limited to any contract or agreement for any term not exceeding fifty years;

To cooperate with and act in conjunction with the federal government or any of its engineers, officers, boards, commissions, or departments, or with the state or any of its engineers, officers, boards, commissions, or departments, or with any other public body or any other person in the acquisition, improvement, or equipment of any facilities or any project authorized for the district or for any other works, acts, or purposes provided for in this article, and to adopt and carry out any definite plan or system of work for any such purpose;

To cooperate with the federal government or any public body by an agreement therewith by which the district may:

Acquire and provide, without cost to the cooperating entity, the land, easements, and rights-of-way necessary for the acquisition, improvement, or equipment of any project;

Hold the cooperating entity free from and save it harmless from any claim for damages arising from the acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, and operation of any facilities;

Maintain and operate any facilities in accordance with regulations prescribed by the cooperating entity;

Establish and enforce regulations, if any, concerning the facilities and satisfactory to the cooperating entity;

To provide by any contract for any term not exceeding fifty years, or otherwise, without an election:

For the joint use of personnel, equipment, and facilities of the district and any public body, including without limitation public buildings constructed by or under the supervision of the board or the governing body of the public body concerned, upon such terms and agreements and within such areas within the district as may be determined, for the promotion and protection of health, comfort, safety, life, welfare, and property of the inhabitants of the district and any such public body and any other persons of interest;

For the joint employment of clerks, stenographers, and other employees pertaining to the facilities or any project established in the district, upon such terms and conditions as may be determined for the equitable apportionment of the expenses resulting therefrom.

The board shall provide for comprehensive planning and, where possible, coordinate operations with all regional special purpose districts, regional multipurpose public agencies, and regional planning commissions and any political subdivision that is multijurisdictional in nature and functions wholly or partly within the urban district.

If a single multipurpose service authority is subsequently created in the Denver metropolitan area, the powers, functions, and facilities of the district created by this article shall be transferred to such service authority; except that the general assembly may provide for the transfer to other political subdivisions of any facilities outside the boundaries of such service authority.

The board, wherever and however possible and feasible, shall promote and cooperate with park and recreation districts, municipalities, and other governmental agencies for the development and use of drainageways for recreational and park purposes.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 754, § 24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-24.

32-11-220. Other supplemental powers.

The district also has the following powers:

To enter upon any land to make surveys, borings, soundings, and examinations for the purpose of the district, and to locate the necessary works of any project and any roadways and other rights-of-way pertaining to any project authorized in this article; to acquire all property necessary or convenient for the acquisition, improvement, or equipment of such works, including works constructed and being constructed by private owners, and all necessary appurtenances; and also, where necessary or convenient to such end, and for such purposes and uses, to acquire and hold the stock of corporations, domestic or foreign, owning facilities, franchises, concessions, or rights pertaining to facilities or any project of the district;

To acquire property by agreement, condemnation, or otherwise, and if any street, road, highway, railroad, canal, ditch, or other property subject or devoted to public use becomes subject to interference by reason of the construction or proposed construction of any works of the district, the right to interfere with such property, whether it be publicly or privately owned; but:

If such right is acquired by condemnation proceedings, and if the court finds that public necessity or convenience requires, the judgment may direct the district to relocate such street, road, highway, railroad, canal, ditch, or other property in accordance with the plans prescribed by the court;

If, by such judgment or agreement, the district is required to relocate any such street, road, highway, railroad, canal, ditch, or other property subject or devoted to public use, the board has the power to acquire in the name of the district, by agreement or condemnation, all rights-of-way and other property necessary or proper for compliance with the agreement or judgment of condemnation, and thereafter to make such conveyance of such relocated street, road, highway, railroad, canal, ditch, or other property as may be proper to comply with the agreement or judgment;

To carry on technical and other investigations of all kinds, make measurements, collect data, and make analyses, studies, and inspections pertaining to the facilities and any project, both within and without the district;

To make and keep records in connection with the facilities and any project or otherwise concerning the district;

To arbitrate any differences arising in connection with the facilities and any project or otherwise concerning the district;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all business and affairs pertaining to the facilities and any project authorized in this article, or otherwise concerning the district, and of the acquisition, improvement, equipment, operation, maintenance, and disposal of any property pertaining to the facilities or any such project;

To enter into contracts of indemnity and guaranty, in such form as may be approved by the board, relating to or connected with the performance of any contract or agreement which the district is empowered to enter into under the provisions of this article or of any other law of the state;

To obtain financial statements, appraisals, economic feasibility reports, and valuations of any type pertaining to the facilities or any project or any property relating thereto;

To adopt any resolution authorizing a project or the issuance of district securities, or both, or otherwise pertaining thereto, or otherwise concerning the district;

To make and execute an indenture or other trust instrument pertaining to any district securities authorized in this article, except as otherwise provided in section 32-11-502 and elsewhere in this article;

To make all contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this article, or in the performance of the district's covenants or duties, or in order to secure the payment of district securities;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this article, which specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this article;

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 755, § 25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-25.

32-11-221. Approval of other facilities.

No public body or other person (other than the federal government) shall, after June 14, 1969, acquire or improve within the territorial limits of the district any drainage and flood control facilities (other than gutters and rainspouts attached to buildings and other structures; other than curbs and gutters pertaining to the improvement of any streets, alleys, highways, and other rights-of-way; and other than a collection or secondary storm drainage system, as defined in the Denver regional council of governments storm drainage criteria manual, as from time to time amended) until a proposal for such an acquisition or improvement has been approved by the board.

If any person (other than the federal government) after June 14, 1969, acquires or improves any such facilities without such approval, the board may order their modification to meet the reasonable specifications and other requirements of the district.

The board shall not approve a proposal for any such acquisition or improvement unless the drainage or flood control facilities so to be acquired or improved appropriately complement or supplement the facilities of the district, both proposed and acquired, and upon the adoption of a comprehensive program for the acquisition of facilities for the district, as from time to time modified, if modified, pursuant to section 32-11-214, appropriately conform to such program.

The board shall not unreasonably withhold its approval of nor disapprove any such proposal unless such facilities to be acquired or approved do not so complement or supplement the district's facilities or do not so conform to such a comprehensive program of the district, if any.

If any such proposal does not sufficiently delineate the facilities so to be acquired or improved for the board to determine whether such facilities so complement or supplement the district's facilities and so conform to such a comprehensive program of the district, if any, the board may order such additional information to be furnished to it as it may deem necessary or desirable for it to make such a determination. The board may delay its consideration of any such proposal until the additional information which the board requests is received by it.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 760, § 33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-33.

32-11-222. Powers of public bodies.

The governing body of any public body, upon its behalf and in its name, for the purpose of aiding and cooperating in any project authorized in this article, upon the terms and with or without consideration and with or without an election, as the governing body determines, has power under this article:

To sell, lease, loan, donate, grant, convey, assign, transfer, and otherwise dispose to the district any facilities or any other property, or any interest therein, pertaining to any project (or any combination thereof);

To make available to the district for temporary use, or otherwise to dispose of any machinery, equipment, facilities, and other property, and any agents, employees, persons with professional training, and any other persons, to effect the purposes of this article. Any such property owned and persons in the employ of any public body while engaged in performing for the district any service, activity, or undertaking authorized in this article, pursuant to contract or otherwise, shall have and retain all of the powers, privileges, immunities, rights, and duties of, and shall be deemed to be engaged in the service and employment of, such public body, notwithstanding that such service, activity, or undertaking is being performed in or for the district.

To enter into any agreement or joint agreement between or among the federal government, the district, and any public bodies (or any combination thereof) extending over any period not exceeding fifty years, which is mutually agreed thereby, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, respecting action or proceedings pertaining to any power granted in this article, and the use or joint use of any facilities, project, or other property herein authorized;

To sell, lease, loan, donate, grant, convey, assign, transfer, or pay over to the district any facilities or any project authorized in this article, or any part or parts thereof, or any interest in personal property or real property, or any funds available for acquisition, improvement, or equipment purposes, including the proceeds of any securities issued for acquisition, improvement, or equipment purposes which may be used by the district in the acquisition, improvement, equipment, maintenance, and operation of any facilities or project authorized in this article (or any combination thereof);

To transfer, grant, convey, or assign and set over to the district any contracts which may have been awarded by the public body for the acquisition, improvement, or equipment of any project not begun or, if begun, not completed;

To budget and appropriate, and each public body is required and directed to budget and appropriate from time to time the proceeds of taxes, service charges, and other revenues legally available therefor to pay all obligations arising from the exercise of any powers granted in this article as such obligation accrues and becomes due;

To provide for an agency, by any agreement authorized in this article, to administer or execute that or any collateral agreement, which agency may be one of the parties to the agreement, or a commission or board constituted pursuant to the agreement;

To provide that any such agency shall possess the common power specified in the agreement, and may exercise it in the manner or according to the method provided in the agreement. Such power is subject to the restrictions upon the manner of exercising the power of any one of the contracting parties, which party shall be designated by the agreement.

To continue any agreement authorized in this article for a definite term not exceeding fifty years, or until rescinded or terminated, which agreement may provide for the method by which it may be rescinded or terminated by any party.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 761, § 34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-34.